New York, session 2025-2026, S10120.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The agriculture and markets law is amended by adding a new 2 section 215-d to read as follows: 3 § 215-d. Corn masa flour. 1. For purposes of this section, the follow- 4 ing terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "Corn masa flour" shall mean a dry flour-type product made from 6 corn that has been treated with slaked lime or otherwise undergoes a 7 process known as nixtamalization, which shall also include, but not be 8 limited to, masa harina. 9 (b) "Wet corn masa product" shall mean food manufactured by using an 10 alkali solution with corn kernels to transform them into nixtamal. Wet 11 corn masa product shall not include products made with corn masa flour. 12 2. (a) All corn masa flour manufactured, sold, delivered, distributed, 13 held, offered for sale, or used as an ingredient in the manufacture of a 14 food product shall contain 0.7 milligrams of folic acid per pound of 15 corn masa flour within an acceptable industry standard deviation of 16 error. 17 (b) All wet corn masa product manufactured, sold, delivered, distrib- 18 uted, held, offered for sale, or used as an ingredient in the manufac- 19 ture of a food product shall contain folic acid at a level of 0.4 milli- 20 grams of folic acid per pound of end product within an acceptable 21 industry standard of deviation of error. 22 3. All corn masa flour and wet corn masa product packaging shall 23 include: 24 (a) a declaration of folic acid on the nutrition label in accordance 25 with applicable federal law, including, but not limited to, section 26 101.9 of title 21 of the code of Federal Regulations; and 27 (b) a declaration that the product contains corn masa flour or was 28 manufactured through a wet corn masa manufacturing process. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15242-02-6 S. 10120 2 1 § 2. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivi- 2 sion, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 3 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, 4 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 5 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section 6 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg- 7 ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of 8 the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such 9 invalid provisions had not been included herein. 10 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 11 it shall have become a law.